District of Columbia statutes.
34-921

Record of proceedings to be kept; testimony to be taken stenographically.

A full and complete record shall be kept of all proceedings had before the Commission or its agents on any formal investigation had, and all testimony shall be taken down by a stenographer appointed by the Commission.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 985, ch. 150, § 8, par. 51
1981 Ed., § 43-622.
1973 Ed., § 43-421.